Washington statutes.
RCW 3.50.097

Judge's oath—Bonds.

Every judge of a municipal court, before entering upon the duties of the office, shall take and subscribe the following oath or affirmation: "I do solemnly swear (or affirm) that I will support the Constitution of the United States and the Constitution of the State of Washington, and that I will faithfully discharge the duties of the office of judge of the municipal court of the city of . . . . . . (naming such city) according to the best of my ability." The oath shall be filed in the office of the county auditor. The judge shall also give such bonds to the state and city for the faithful performance of the judge's duties as may be by law or ordinance directed.

[ 1984 c 258 s 110.]

NOTES:

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.

Application—1984 c 258 ss 101-139: See note following RCW 3.50.005.